New York, session 2025-2026, A3494.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 3 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 part 2 to read as follows: 3 PART II 4 STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES POLICY AND DOCUMENTATION 5 § 150. Students with disabilities policy and documentation. 6 § 150. Students with disabilities policy and documentation. 1. Each 7 institution of higher education shall adopt a policy that documentation 8 of an individualized education program (IEP) in accordance with section 9 614(d) of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, which 10 is submitted by an enrolled or admitted student, is sufficient to estab- 11 lish that such student is an individual with a disability. 12 2. An institution of higher education may request additional documen- 13 tation from an individual who had an individualized education program 14 (IEP) if such individualized education program (IEP) was not in effect 15 immediately prior to the date when such individual exited high school. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 18 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 19 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 20 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06702-01-5